Florida, session 2026, SB652.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsections (6), (7), and (8) are added to 23 section 723.022, Florida Statutes, to read: 24 723.022âMobile home park ownerâs general obligations.âA 25 mobile home park owner shall at all times: 26 (6)âRequire mobile home owners to maintain a current mobile 27 home registration sticker on their mobile home at all times. 28 (7)âMaintain up-to-date records regarding the owner of each 29 mobile home in the mobile home park and provide such records to 30 the county or municipal code enforcement entity upon request for 31 the purpose of enforcing a mobile home ownerâs general 32 obligations pursuant to s. 723.023. 33 (8)âRequire each mobile home owner to maintain the mobile 34 home and its lot in accordance with all applicable building, 35 housing, fire, and health codes and require other persons on the 36 premises, with the mobile home ownerâs consent, to comply with 37 such codes. 38 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 723.023, Florida 39 Statutes, is amended to read: 40 723.023âMobile home ownerâs general obligations.âA mobile 41 home owner shall: 42 (1)âAt all times comply with all obligations imposed on 43 mobile home owners by applicable provisions of building, 44 housing, fire, and health codes, including compliance with all 45 building permits and construction requirements for construction 46 on the mobile home and lot. The home owner is responsible for 47 all fines imposed by the local government for noncompliance with 48 any local codes. 49 Section 3.âSection 723.024, Florida Statutes, is amended to 50 read: 51 723.024âCompliance by mobile home park owners and mobile 52 home owners.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter 53 or of any local law, ordinance, or code: 54 (1)âIf a unit of local government finds that a violation of 55 a local code or ordinance has occurred, the unit of local 56 government must shall cite the responsible party for the 57 violation and enforce the citation under its local code and 58 ordinance enforcement authority. A unit of local government may 59 adopt and enforce local codes or ordinances to ensure compliance 60 with ss. 723.022 and 723.023. 61 (2)âA lien, penalty, fine, or other administrative or civil 62 proceeding may not be brought against a mobile home owner or 63 mobile home for any duty or responsibility of the mobile home 64 park owner under s. 723.022 or against a mobile home park owner 65 or mobile home park property for any duty or responsibility of 66 the mobile home owner under s. 723.023. 67 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 68 made by this act to section 723.022, Florida Statutes, in a 69 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 723.0615, Florida 70 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 71 723.0615âRetaliatory conduct.â 72 (1)âIt is unlawful for a mobile home park owner to 73 discriminatorily increase a home ownerâs rent or 74 discriminatorily decrease services to a home owner, or to bring 75 or threaten to bring an action for possession or other civil 76 action, primarily because the park owner is retaliating against 77 the home owner. In order for the home owner to raise the defense 78 of retaliatory conduct, the home owner must have acted in good 79 faith and not for any improper purposes, such as to harass or to 80 cause unnecessary delay or for frivolous purpose or needless 81 increase in the cost of litigation. Examples of conduct for 82 which the park owner may not retaliate include, but are not 83 limited to, situations where: 84 (a)âThe home owner has in good faith complained to a 85 governmental agency charged with responsibility for enforcement 86 of a building, housing, or health code of a suspected violation 87 applicable to the mobile home park; 88 (b)âThe home owner has organized, encouraged, or 89 participated in a homeownersâ organization; or 90 (c)âThe home owner has complained to the park owner for 91 failure to comply with s. 723.022. 92 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 93 made by this act to sections 723.022 and 723.023, Florida 94 Statutes, in references thereto, subsection (5) of section 95 723.004, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 96 723.004âLegislative intent; preemption of subject matter.â 97 (5)âNothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent 98 the enforcement of a right or duty under this section, s. 99 723.022, s. 723.023, s. 723.031, s. 723.032, s. 723.033, s. 100 723.035, s. 723.037, s. 723.038, s. 723.061, s. 723.0615, s. 101 723.062, s. 723.063, or s. 723.081 by civil action after the 102 party has exhausted its administrative remedies, if any. 103 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 104 made by this act to sections 723.022 and 723.023, Florida 105 Statutes, in references thereto, section 723.005, Florida 106 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 107 723.005âRegulation by division.âThe division has the power 108 and duty to enforce and ensure compliance with the provisions of 109 this chapter and rules promulgated pursuant hereto relating to 110 the rental, development, and sale of mobile home parks. However, 111 the division does not have the power or duty to enforce mobile 112 home park rules and regulations or to enforce the provisions of 113 ss. 723.022, 723.023, and 723.033. 114 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.